Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,183
Improper setoff; how treated.

In the case of an improper setoff, the agency receiving the benefit of the setoff by having a purportedly delinquent tax paid shall be liable to the taxpayer for payment of any setoff, penalty, and interest.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 10.